California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(3) Any interest accruing from a deficiency based on a final federal determination of tax, for the same period that interest was abated on the related federal deficiency amount under Section 6404(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, and the error or delay occurred on or before the issuance of the final federal determination. This subparagraph shall apply to any ministerial act for which the interest accrued after September 25, 1987, or for any managerial act applicable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998, for which the Franchise Tax Board may propose an assessment or allow a claim for refund.

(b) For
 purposes of subdivision (a):

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), an error or delay shall be taken into account only if no significant aspect of that error or delay can be attributed to the taxpayer involved and after the Franchise Tax Board has contacted the taxpayer in writing with respect to that deficiency or payment.

(2) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (4), after the Franchise Tax Board mails its notice of determination not to abate interest, a taxpayer may appeal the Franchise Tax Board’s determination to the State Board of Equalization within the following periods:

(i) Thirty days in the case of any unpaid interest described under subdivision (a).

(ii) Ninety days in the case of any paid interest described under
 subdivision (a).

(B) The State Board of Equalization shall have jurisdiction over the appeal to determine whether the Franchise Tax Board’s failure to abate interest under this section was an abuse of discretion, and may order an abatement.

(C) Except for clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A), the provisions of this paragraph are operative for requests for abatement of interest made on or after January 1, 1998. The provisions of clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall apply to requests for abatement of interest made on or after January 1, 2001, in accordance with subdivision (d).

(3) If the Franchise Tax Board fails to mail its notice of determination on a request to abate interest within six months after the request is filed, the taxpayer may consider that the Franchise Tax Board has determined not to
 abate interest and appeal that determination to the board. This paragraph shall not apply to requests for abatement of interest made pursuant to paragraph (4).

(4) A request for abatement of interest related to a proposed deficiency may be made with the written protest of the underlying proposed deficiency filed pursuant to Section 19041 or with an appeal to the board under Section 19045 in the form and manner required by the Franchise Tax Board. The action of the Franchise Tax Board denying any portion of the request for abatement of interest relating to the proposed deficiency shall be considered as part of the appeal of the action of the Franchise Tax Board on the protest of the proposed deficiency. If the taxpayer filed an appeal from the Franchise Tax Board’s action on the protest of a proposed deficiency and the deficiency is final pursuant to Section 19048, the taxpayer may not thereafter request an abatement of interest accruing prior
 to the time the deficiency is final. However, the taxpayer may thereafter request an abatement pursuant to this section limited to interest accruing after the deficiency is final.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall abate the assessment of all interest on any erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 19411 until 30 days after the date demand for repayment is made, unless the taxpayer (or a related party) has in any way caused that erroneous refund.

(d) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 863 of the Statutes of 2000 shall apply to requests for abatement of interest and appeals made on or after January 1, 2001.

(e) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the amendments made by Chapter 600 of the Statutes of 1997 are operative with respect to
 taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19105.

In the case of an individual or fiduciary, the Franchise Tax Board shall not assess interest charges pursuant to Section 19101 for the period between 45 days after the date of final review of an audit determining an additional amount is owed and the date a notice of proposed deficiency assessment is sent to the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 863, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19107.

Where an overpayment is made by any individual for any year, and a deficiency is owing from the spouse of the taxpayer for the same year, and both spouses notify the Franchise Tax Board in writing prior to the expiration of the time within which credit for the overpayment may be allowed that the overpayment may be credited against the deficiency, no interest shall be assessed on that portion of the deficiency as is
 extinguished by the credit for the period of time subsequent to the date the overpayment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 109.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19108.

(a) Where an overpayment is made by any taxpayer for any year, and a deficiency is owing from the same taxpayer for any other year, the overpayment, if the period within which credit for the overpayment may be allowed has not expired, shall be credited on the deficiency, if the period within which assessment of the deficiency may be proposed has not expired, and the balance, if any, shall be credited or refunded to the taxpayer. No interest shall be assessed on the portion of the deficiency as is extinguished by
 the credit for the period of time subsequent to the date the overpayment was made.

(b) For the purposes of this section the returns of a decedent and his or her estate shall be considered returns of the same taxpayer and the returns for the decedent and his or her estate filed for the year of death shall be considered returns for different taxable years.

(c) This section is not intended, nor shall it be construed, as a limitation on the Franchise Tax Board’s right to offset or recoup barred assessments against overpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19109.

(a) If the Franchise Tax Board extends for any period the time for filing a return under Section 18572 or subdivision (a) of Section 18567 and the time for paying the tax under Section 18572 or subdivision (c) of Section 18567 (and waives any penalties relating to the failure to so file or so pay) for any taxpayer located in a presidentially declared disaster area or any county or city in this state
 which is proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of emergency that incurred a loss, the Franchise Tax Board shall abate for that period the assessment of any interest prescribed under this article on that tax.

(b) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may, after written request by a taxpayer, abate the interest on any deficiency or related to a proposed deficiency described in Section 19033 or on a payment of tax to the extent that interest is attributable in whole or in part to the Franchise Tax Board’s delay in the mailing of a notice or other correspondence that requires a response from a taxpayer, in connection with a presidentially declared disaster area, or any county or city in this state that is proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of emergency.

(2) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (4), after the Franchise Tax Board mails its
 notice of determination not to abate interest, a taxpayer may appeal the Franchise Tax Board’s determination to the board within the following period, as applicable:

(i) Thirty days in the case of any unpaid interest described under paragraph (1).

(ii) Ninety days in the case of any paid interest described under paragraph (1).

(B) The board shall have jurisdiction over the appeal to determine whether the Franchise Tax Board’s failure to abate interest under this subdivision was an abuse of discretion, and may order an abatement.

(3) If the Franchise Tax Board fails to mail its notice of determination on a request to abate interest within six months after the request is filed, it shall be considered that the Franchise Tax Board has determined not to
 abate interest and the taxpayer may appeal that determination to the board. This paragraph shall not apply to requests for abatement of interest made under paragraph (4).

(4) A request for abatement of interest related to a proposed deficiency may be made with the written protest of the underlying proposed deficiency filed under Section 19041 or with an appeal to the board under Section 19045 in the form and manner required by the Franchise Tax Board. The action of the Franchise Tax Board denying any portion of the request for abatement of interest related to the proposed deficiency shall be considered as part of the appeal of the action of the Franchise Tax Board on the protest of the proposed deficiency. If the taxpayer filed an appeal from the Franchise Tax Board’s action on the protest of a proposed deficiency and the deficiency is final pursuant to Section 19048, the taxpayer may not thereafter request an abatement of interest accruing
 prior to the time the deficiency is final. The taxpayer, however, may thereafter request an abatement pursuant to this subdivision limited to the interest accruing after the deficiency is final.

(5) This subdivision shall apply to requests for abatement of interest made on or after the effective date of the act adding this paragraph.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “presidentially declared disaster area” means, with respect to any taxpayer, any area which the President has determined warrants assistance by the federal government under the Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 382, Sec. 2.   (SB 1158)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19110.

(a) When the correction of an erroneous inclusion or deduction of an item or items in the computation of income of a trust, estate, parent, or spouse for any year results in an overpayment for that year by the trust, estate, parent, or spouse, and also results in a deficiency for the same year for a grantor of the trust or beneficiary of the estate or trust, or child of the parent, or spouse of the
 child, or the spouse of the spouse, the overpayment, if the period within which credit for the overpayment may be allowed has not expired, shall be credited on the deficiency, if the period within which the deficiency may be proposed has not expired, and the balance, if any, shall be credited or refunded. No interest shall be assessed on the portion of the deficiency as is extinguished by the credit for the period of time subsequent to the date the overpayment was made.

(b) When the correction of an erroneous inclusion or deduction of an item or items in the computation of income of a grantor of a trust, beneficiary of an estate or trust, a child, or spouse of the child, or a spouse for any year results in an overpayment for that year by the grantor, beneficiary, child, or spouse, and also results in a deficiency for the same year for the grantor’s or beneficiary’s trust, the beneficiary’s estate, the child’s parent, or spouse of the child, or
 the beneficiary’s spouse, the overpayment, if the period within which credit for the overpayment may be allowed has not expired, shall be credited on the deficiency, if the period within which the deficiency may be proposed has not expired, and the balance, if any, shall be credited or refunded. No interest shall be assessed on the portion of the deficiency as is extinguished by the credit for the period of time subsequent to the date the overpayment was made.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) are not intended, nor shall they be construed as a limitation on the Franchise Tax Board’s right to offset or recoup barred assessments against overpayments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 110.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19112.

Interest may be waived for any period for which the Franchise Tax Board determines that an individual or fiduciary demonstrates inability to pay that interest solely because of extreme financial hardship caused by significant disability or other catastrophic circumstance. Any waiver under this section shall be withdrawn retroactively if made because of fraud, malfeasance, misrepresentation, or omission of any material fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19113.

If any portion of a tax is satisfied by credit of an overpayment, then no interest shall be imposed under this article on the portion of the tax so satisfied for any period during which, if the credit had not been made, interest would have been allowable with respect to the overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19114.

Interest prescribed under this article on any tax may be assessed and collected at any time during the period within which the tax to which the interest relates may be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19116.

(a) In the case of an individual who files a return of tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) for a taxable year on or before the due date for the return, including extensions, if the Franchise Tax Board does not provide a notice to the taxpayer specifically stating the taxpayer’s liability and the basis of the liability before the close of the notification period, the Franchise Tax
 Board shall suspend the imposition of any interest, penalty, addition to tax, or additional amount with respect to any failure relating to the return which is computed by reference to the period of time the failure continues to exist and which is properly allocable to the suspension period.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), “notification period” means the 36-month period beginning on the later of either of the following:

(A) The date on which the return is filed.

(B) The due date of the return without regard to extensions.

(2) “Suspension period” means the period beginning on the day after the close of the notification period and ending on the
 date which is 15 days after the date on which notice described in subdivision (a) is provided by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) If, after the return for a taxable year is filed, the taxpayer provides to the Franchise Tax Board one or more signed written documents showing that the taxpayer owes an additional amount of tax for the taxable year, paragraph (1) shall be applied by substituting the date the last of the documents was provided for the date on which the return was filed.

(c) This section shall be applied separately with respect to each item or adjustment.

(d) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any penalty imposed by Section 19131.

(2) Any penalty imposed by
 Section 19132.

(3) Any interest, penalty, addition to tax, or additional amount involving fraud.

(4) Any interest, penalty, addition to tax, or additional amount with respect to any tax liability shown on the return.

(5) Any criminal penalty.

(6) Any interest, penalty, addition to tax, or additional amount with respect to any gross misstatement.

(7) Any interest, penalty, addition to tax, or additional amount relating to any reportable transaction with respect to which the requirements of Section 6664(d)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code are not met, and any listed transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(8) Any interest, penalty, addition to tax, or additional amount relating to any abusive tax avoidance transaction, as defined in Section 19777, as amended by the act adding this paragraph.

(e) For taxpayers required by subdivision (a) of Section 18622 to report a change or correction by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority the following rules shall apply:

(1) The notification period under subdivision (a) shall be either of the following:

(A) One year from the date the notice required by Section 18622 is filed with the Franchise Tax Board by the taxpayer or the Internal Revenue Service, if the taxpayer or the Internal Revenue Service reports that change or correction within six months after the final federal determination.

(B) Two years from the date when the notice required by Section 18622 is filed with the Franchise Tax Board by the taxpayer or the Internal Revenue Service, if after the six-month period required in Section 18622, a taxpayer or the Internal Revenue Service reports a change or correction.

(2) The suspension period under subdivision (a) shall mean the period beginning on the day after the close of the notification period under paragraph (1) and ending on the date which is 15 days after the date on which notice described in subdivision (a) is provided by the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) For notices sent after January 1, 2004, this section does not apply to taxpayers with taxable income greater than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) that have been contacted by the Franchise Tax Board regarding the use of a potentially
 abusive tax shelter as defined by Section 19777, as added by Chapter 656 of the Statutes of 2003 and amended by Section 331 of Chapter 183 of the Statutes of 2004.

(g) This section shall apply to taxable years ending after October 10, 1999.

(h) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 691 of the Statutes of 2005 shall apply to notices sent after January 1, 2005.

(i) (1) The amendments made to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) by Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2010 shall apply to notices provided after January 1, 2011.

(2) Paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), as added by Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2010, shall apply to documents provided on or after January 1, 2011.

(3) Paragraph (8) of subdivision (d), as added by the act adding this paragraph, shall apply to notices provided, or amended returns filed, on or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 4.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.   Note: This 2011 amendment added para. (8) of subd. (d) and para. (3) of subd. (i).)
-------------------------------------------

19117.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall include with each notice to an individual taxpayer which includes an amount of interest required to be paid by the taxpayer under this part information with respect to the section under which interest is imposed and a description of how the interest is computed. Upon the request of the taxpayer, the Franchise Tax Board shall also provide a computation of the interest.

(b) This section shall apply to any notice issued after December 31,
 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 19.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19120.

Any portion of any amount that has been erroneously refunded and that is recoverable by suit pursuant to Section 19411 shall bear interest at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 from the date of the payment of the refund. Abatement of interest under this section is governed by subdivision (c) of Section 19104.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 455, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Penalties and Additions to Tax [19131. - 19187.]

19131.

(a) If any taxpayer fails to make and file a return required by this part on or before the due date of the return or the due date as extended by the Franchise Tax Board, then, unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, 5 percent of the tax shall be added to the tax for each month or fraction thereof elapsing between the due date of the return
 (determined without regard to any extension of time for filing) and the date on which filed, but the total penalty may not exceed 25 percent of the tax. In the case of a commencing corporation, the penalty shall apply to all tax accruable on the due date of the return. The penalty so added to the tax shall be due and payable upon notice and demand from the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) In the case of an individual or fiduciary who fails to file a return of tax required by this part within 60 days of the date prescribed for filing of that return (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing), unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, this penalty may not be less than the lesser of one hundred thirty-five dollars ($135) or 100 percent of the amount of tax required to be shown on the return.

(c) For purposes of this
 section, the amount of tax required to be shown on the return shall be reduced by the amount of any part of the tax which is paid on or before the date prescribed for payment of the tax and by the amount of any credit against the tax which may be claimed upon the return.

(d) If any failure to file any return is fraudulent, subdivision (a) shall be applied by:

(1) Substituting “15 percent” for “5 percent,” and

(2) Substituting “75 percent” for “25 percent.”

(e) This section does not apply to any failure to pay any estimated tax required by Section 19025 or 19136.

(f) (1) The penalty described in this section is presumed not to apply if, with respect to the same taxable
 year, all of the following conditions are met:

(A) A taxpayer fails to make and file a return required by this part on or before the due date of the return, determined with regard to any extension of time for filing, and fails to make and file a return required by Section 6012 of the Internal Revenue Code on or before the due date of the return, determined with regard to any extension of time for filing.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board proposes a deficiency assessment that is based upon a final federal determination.

(C) The Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States determines that the penalty described in Section 6651(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply because the failure to file the federal return on or before the date prescribed for its filing was due to reasonable cause and
 not due to willful neglect.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may rebut the presumption described in paragraph (1) by establishing, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the taxpayer’s failure to make and file a return required by this part was not due to reasonable cause or was due to willful neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 44.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19131.5.

(a) Section 6164 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to extension of time for payment of taxes by corporations expecting carrybacks, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) Section 6164 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “Secretary or the Franchise Tax Board” for the word
 “Secretary” in each place it appears.

(2) Section 6164(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001)” in lieu of the phrase “subtitle A.”

(3) Section 6164(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to contents of statement, is modified by substituting the phrase “Section 24416” in lieu of the phrase “Section 172(b).”

(4) Section 6164(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(5) Section 6164(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to jeopardy, is modified as follows:

(A) By substituting the phrase “he or the Franchise Tax Board” for the word “he” in each place it appears.

(B) By substituting the phrase “him or the Franchise Tax Board” for the word “him” in each place it appears.

(6) Section 6164(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to consolidated returns, is modified by substituting the phrase “combined report” in lieu of the phrase “consolidated return” in each place it appears.

(c) This section shall not apply to a carryback of a net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 19.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19132.

(a) (1) Unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, a penalty computed in accordance with paragraph (2) is hereby imposed in the case of failure to pay any of the following:

(A) The amount shown as tax on any return on or before the date prescribed for payment of that tax determined with regard to any extension of time for payment.

(B) Any amount in respect of any tax required to be shown on a return which is not so shown including an assessment made pursuant to Section 19051 within 15 days of the date of the notice and demand therefor.

(C) The amount required to be paid by Section 19021, if applicable, that is not paid.

(D) The amount required to be paid by Section 17941 or 23091, if applicable, that is not paid.

(E) The amount required to be paid by Section 17948 or 23097, if applicable, that is not paid.

(2) The penalty imposed under paragraph (1) shall consist of both of the following:

(A) Five percent of the total tax unpaid as defined in subdivision (c).

(B) An amount computed at the rate of 0.5 percent per month of the “remaining tax” as defined in subdivision (d) for each additional month or fraction thereof not to exceed 40 months during which the “remaining tax” is greater than zero.

(3) The aggregate amount of penalty imposed by this subdivision shall not exceed 25 percent of the total unpaid tax and shall be due and payable upon notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board. The tender of a check or money order does not constitute payment of the tax for purposes of this section unless the check or money order is paid on presentment.

(b) The penalty prescribed by subdivision (a) shall not be assessed if, for the same taxable year, the sum of any penalties imposed under Section 19131 relating to failure to file return and Section 19133 relating to failure to file return
 after demand is equal to or greater than the subdivision (a) penalty. In the event the penalty imposed under subdivision (a) is greater than the sum of any penalties imposed under Sections 19131 and 19133, the penalty imposed under subdivision (a) shall be the amount which exceeds the sum of any penalties imposed under Sections 19131 and 19133.

(c) For purposes of this section, total tax unpaid means the amount of tax shown on the return reduced by both of the following:

(1) The amount of any part of the tax which is paid on or before the date prescribed for payment of the tax.

(2) The amount of any credit against the tax which may be claimed upon the return.

(d) For purposes of this section, “remaining tax” means total tax unpaid reduced by the amount
 of any payment of the tax.

(e) If the amount required to be shown as a tax on a return is less than the amount shown as tax on that return, subdivisions (a), (c), and (d) shall be applied by substituting that lower amount.

(f) No interest shall accrue on the portion of the penalty prescribed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision are operative for notices issued on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 50.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19132.5.

(a) (1) An individual taxpayer may elect to request a one-time abatement of a timeliness penalty under this section for a timeliness penalty that has been considered and rejected for abatement pursuant to the provisions of the section under which the penalty is imposed.

(2) An individual taxpayer may, in lieu of requesting consideration for abatement pursuant to the section under which the timeliness penalty is imposed, instead request a one-time abatement of a timeliness penalty under this section.

(b) If a taxpayer described in subdivision (a) requests, either orally or in writing, the abatement of a
 timeliness penalty pursuant to this section, the timeliness penalty shall be abated if all of the following apply:

(1) The taxpayer has not previously been required to file a California personal income tax return under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or has not previously been granted abatement under this section.

(2) The taxpayer has filed all returns required under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) as of the date of the taxpayer’s request for abatement under this section.

(3) Excluding the timeliness penalty that is the subject of the abatement request under this section, the taxpayer has paid in full, or arranged to pay pursuant to an installment agreement, any tax, penalties, fees, and interest due for the required returns pursuant to paragraph (2) and
 the taxpayer is current with all installment payments.

(c) For purposes of this section, “timeliness penalty” means a penalty imposed under Section 19131 or 19132 for one taxable year with respect to a return filed by an individual for that taxable year.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) A timeliness penalty imposed and subsequently abated due to a determination of reasonable cause, or reasonable cause and not willful neglect, with respect to the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s spouse shall be considered to have not been imposed for purposes of determining eligibility for timeliness penalty abatement under this section.

(2) A timeliness penalty shall be
 considered imposed on the original due date of the return for the taxable year for which the penalty is imposed.

(e) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(f) This section shall apply to requests for abatement made for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 55, Sec. 10.   (AB 194)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19133.

If any taxpayer fails or refuses to furnish any information requested in writing by the Franchise Tax Board or fails or refuses to make and file a return required by this part upon notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board, then, unless the failure is due to reasonable cause and not willful neglect, the Franchise Tax Board may add a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of tax determined pursuant to Section 19087 or of any deficiency tax assessed by the Franchise Tax Board concerning the assessment of which the information or return
 was required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19134.

(a) The provisions of Section 6657 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to bad checks, shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 6657 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to bad checks, is modified to apply to payments made by credit card remittance or electronic funds transfer (as provided by Section 19011) in addition
 to payments made by check or money order.

(c) For payments received prior to January 1, 1993, this section shall be applied only to payments pertaining to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(d) For payments received on or after January 1, 1993, this section shall be applied to all payments, without regard to taxable year.

(e) The amendments made to Section 6657 of the Internal Revenue Code by Public Law 110-28 that are incorporated by reference under this section shall apply to all payments received after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, without regard to taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 45.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19135.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall impose a penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per taxable year whenever an entity described in paragraph (2) is doing business in this state, within the meaning of Section 23101, and fails to make and file a return as required by this part, within 60 days after the Franchise Tax Board sends the taxpayer a notice and demand to file the
 required tax return, unless the failure is due to reasonable cause and not willful neglect.

(2) (A) A foreign corporation or a foreign limited liability company that fails to qualify to do business in this state or whose powers, rights, and privileges have been forfeited.

(B) A domestic corporation or a domestic limited liability company that has been suspended.

(b) The penalty shall be in addition to any other penalty that may be due under this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 313, Sec. 3.   (AB 318)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.

(a) Section 6654 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to failure by an individual to pay estimated income tax, applies, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 6654(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to refer to the rate determined under Section 19521 in lieu of Section 6621 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) (1) Section 6654(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exceptions where the tax is a small amount, does not apply.

(2) An addition to tax shall not be imposed under this section if the tax imposed under Section 17041 or 17048 and the tax imposed under Section 17062 for the preceding
 taxable year, minus the sum of any credits against the tax provided by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part, or the tax computed under Section 17041 or 17048 upon the estimated income for the taxable year, minus the sum of any credits against the tax provided by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part, is less than five hundred dollars ($500), except in the case of a separate return filed by a married person the amount shall be less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(d) Section 6654(f) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply and for purposes of this section the term “tax” means the tax imposed under Section 17041 or 17048 and the tax imposed under Section 17062 less any credits against the tax provided by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part, other than the credit provided by subdivision (a) of Section 19002.

(e) (1) The credit for tax withheld on wages, as specified in Section 6654(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, is the credit allowed under subdivision (a) of Section 19002.

(2) (A) Section 6654(g)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “the applicable percentage” for the phrase “an equal part.”

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “applicable percentage” means the percentage amount prescribed under Section 6654(d)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by subdivision (a) of Section 19136.1.

(f) This section applies to a nonresident individual.

(g) (1) An addition to tax shall not be imposed under this section to the extent that the
 underpayment was created or increased by either of the following:

(A) Any law that is chaptered during and operative for the taxable year of the underpayment.

(B) If, for a taxable year prior to its repeal, the adjustment factor for the credit authorized by Section 17052 for the taxable year was less than the adjustment factor for that credit for the preceding taxable year.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 18415, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) applies to penalties imposed under this section on or after January 1, 2005.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 18415, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) applies to penalties imposed under this section on or after January 1, 2016.

(h) The amendments made to this section by Section 5 of Chapter 305 of the Statutes of 2008 apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009.

(i) The amendments made to this section by Section 3 of Chapter 15 of the Fourth Extraordinary Session of the Statutes of 2009 apply to amounts withheld on wages beginning on or after January 1, 2009.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), this section shall not apply to a nonresident individual electing to file in a group return pursuant to Section 18537, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 73, Sec. 7.   (AB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.1.

(a) Section 6654(d)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that in lieu of the required installments specified in that section, the amount of required installments shall instead be as follows:

(1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and before January 1, 2010, the amount of required installments shall be:

(A) For the 1st and 2nd required installments, 30 percent of the required annual payment.

(B) For the 3rd and 4th required installments, 20 percent of the required annual payment.

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2010, the amount of required installments shall be:

(A) For the 1st required installment, 30 percent of the required annual payment.

(B) For the 2nd required installment, 40 percent of the required annual payment.

(C) The amount of the 3rd
 required installment shall be zero.

(D) For the 4th required installment, 30 percent of the required annual payment.

(b) Section 6654(d)(2)(C)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to applicable percentage, is modified as follows:

(1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and before January 1, 2010, by substituting “27” for “22.5,” “54” for “45,” and “72” for “67.5.”

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2010, by substituting “27” for “22.5,” “63” for “45,” and “63” for “67.5.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   (AB 17 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.2.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 1999, Section 6654(d)(1)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on use of preceding year’s tax, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 56.5.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.3.

(a) Section 6654(d)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to additionally provide that clause (ii) shall not apply if the adjusted gross income shown on the return of the individual for the taxable year is equal to or greater than $1 million ($500,000 in the case of a married individual filing a separate return).

(b) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.   Effective December 31, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.5.
